North Carolina statutes. Chapter 165. Veterans.
Article 7A. Priority in Employment Assistance for Veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States. [Repealed]

§§ 165-44.1 through 165-44.6.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-1280 through 143B-1285 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 24.1(j), as amended by Session Laws 2015-268, s. 7.3(a), effective July 1, 2015.